Rhode Island statutes. Title 36 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 10.1 Rhode Island Public Employee Pension Revocation and Reduction Act

36-10.1-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Public Employee Pension Revocation and Reduction Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 306, art. 1, § 8.

36-10.1-2.
Definitions.

“Crime related to public office or public employment” shall mean any of the following criminal offenses:

The committing, aiding, or abetting of an embezzlement of public funds;

The committing, aiding, or abetting of any felonious theft by a public officer or employee from his or her employer;

Bribery in connection with employment of a public officer or employee; and

The committing of any felony by a public officer or employee who, willfully and with the intent to defraud, realizes or obtains, or attempts to realize or obtain, a profit, gain, or advantage for himself or herself or for some other person through the use or attempted use of the power, rights, privileges, duties, or position of his or her public office or employment position.

“Public official” or “public employee” shall mean any current or former state or municipal elected official as defined in §

36-14-2(10)

, state or municipal appointed official as defined in §

36-14-2(4)

, and any employee of state or local government, of boards, commissions or agencies as defined in §

36-14-2(8)(i)

, (ii), who is otherwise entitled to receive or who is receiving retirement benefits under this title, under title 16, under title 45, under title 8, under chapter 30 of title 28, under chapter 43 of title 31, or under chapter 28 of title 42, whether that person is acting on a permanent or temporary basis and whether or not compensated on a full-time or part-time basis. For the purposes of this chapter, all these persons are deemed to be engaged in public employment.

As used in this chapter, the phrase “pleads guilty or nolo contendere” shall not include any plea of nolo contendere which does not constitute a conviction by virtue of §

12-10-12

or

12-18-3

.

For purposes of this chapter, “domestic partner” shall be defined as a person who, prior to the decedent’s death, was in an exclusive, intimate and committed relationship with the decedent, and who certifies by affidavit that their relationship met the following qualifications:

Both partners were at least eighteen (18) years of age and were mentally competent to contract;

Neither partner was married to anyone else;

Partners were not related by blood to a degree which would prohibit marriage in the state of Rhode Island;

Partners resided together and had resided together for at least one year at the time of death; and

Partners were financially interdependent as evidenced by at least two (2) of the following:

Domestic partnership agreement or relationship contract;

Joint mortgage or joint ownership of primary residence;

Two (2) of: (A) joint ownership of motor vehicle; (B) joint checking account; (C) joint credit account; (D) joint lease; and/or

The domestic partner had been designated as a beneficiary for the decedent’s will, retirement contract or life insurance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 306, art. 1, § 8; P.L. 2007, ch. 510, § 13; P.L. 2010, ch. 239, § 12.

36-10.1-3.
Revocation and reduction of benefits.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any retirement or other benefit or payment of any kind to which a public official or public employee is otherwise entitled under this chapter, under title 16, under title 45, under title 8, under chapter 30 of title 28, under chapter 43 of title 31, or under chapter 28 of title 42 shall be revoked or reduced, in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, or §

11-41-31

if, after January 1, 1993, the public official or public employee is convicted of or pleads guilty or nolo contendere to any crime related to his or her public office or public employment. Any such conviction or plea shall be deemed to be a breach of the public officer’s or public employee’s contract with his or her employer.

Whenever any public official or public employee is convicted of or pleads guilty or nolo contendere to any crime related to his or her public office or public employment, the retirement board, if no finding is made by the judge in the criminal action pursuant to §

11-41-31

, shall:

Initiate a civil action in the superior court for the revocation or reduction of any retirement or other benefit or payment to which the public official or public employee is otherwise entitled under this title, under title 16, under title 45, under title 8, under chapter 30 of title 28, under chapter 43 of title 31, or under chapter 28 of title 42.

The superior court shall order the public official or employee to appear and show cause as to why any retirement or other benefit or payment to which the public official or public employee is otherwise entitled under this title, under title 16, under title 45, under title 8, under chapter 30 of title 28, under chapter 43 of title 31, or under chapter 28 of title 42 should not be withheld pending adjudication of the civil action in the superior court.

Legal standing is hereby conferred upon the retirement board to initiate and maintain a civil action, and jurisdiction over that civil action is hereby conferred upon the superior court.

In any civil action under this chapter for the revocation or reduction of retirement or other benefits or payments, the superior court shall determine:

Whether the public employee has been convicted of or pled guilty or nolo contendere to any crime related to his or her public office or public employment and, if so;

Whether the retirement or other benefits or payments to which the public official or public employee is otherwise entitled should be revoked or diminished and, if so;

In what amount or by what proportion such revocation or reduction should be ordered.

In rendering its decision hereunder, the superior court shall consider and address each of the following factors:

The fact that the allowance of retirement or other benefits or payments for service under this title, under title 16, under title 45, under title 8, under chapter 30 of title 28, under chapter 43 of title 31, and under chapter 28 of title 42 presumes and requires that the service shall have been honorably rendered;

The severity of the crime related to public office or public employment of which the public official or public employee has been convicted or to which the public official or public employee has pled guilty or nolo contendere;

The amount of monetary loss suffered by the public official’s or public employee’s employer or by any other person as a result of the subject crime related to public office or public employment;

The degree of public trust reposed in the subject public official or public employee by virtue of his or her public office or public employment; and

Any such other factors as, in the judgment of the superior court, justice may require.

If the superior court determines that the retirement or other benefits or payments of a public official or public employee should be revoked or reduced under this chapter, it may, in its discretion and after taking into consideration the financial needs and resources of any innocent spouse or domestic partner, dependents and/or designated beneficiaries of the public official or public employee, order that some or all of the revoked or reduced benefits or payments be paid to any innocent spouse or domestic partner, dependent or beneficiary as justice may require.

If the superior court determines that the retirement or other benefits or payments of a public official or public employee should not be revoked or reduced under this chapter, it shall order that the retirement or other benefits or payments be made to the public official or public employee as if the initiation of the civil action had not occurred.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 306, art. 1, § 8; P.L. 1995, ch. 212, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 292, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 510, § 13.

36-10.1-4.
Return of contribution.

Any public official or public employee whose retirement or other benefits or payments are revoked pursuant to this chapter shall be entitled to a return of his or her contribution paid into the relevant pension fund(s), without interest.

Any public official or employee whose retirement or other benefits or payments are reduced pursuant to this chapter shall be entitled to a pro rata return of a portion of his or her contribution paid into the relevant pension fund(s) in an amount proportionate to the amount of any such reduction, without interest.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (a) and (b) of this section, no payments in return of contributions shall be made or ordered unless and until the superior court determines that the public official or public employee whose retirement or other benefits or payments have been revoked or reduced under this chapter has satisfied in full any judgments or orders rendered by any court of competent jurisdiction for the payment of restitution for losses incurred by any person as a result of the subject crime related to public office or public employment. If the superior court determines that the public official or employee whose retirement or other benefits or payments have been revoked or reduced under this chapter has failed to satisfy any outstanding judgment or order of restitution rendered by any court of competent jurisdiction, it may order that any funds otherwise due to the public official or public employee as a return of contribution, or any portion thereof, be paid in satisfaction of the judgment or order.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 306, art. 1, § 8.

36-10.1-5.
Municipal employee pension revocation and reduction.

The superior court shall have jurisdiction to review any decisions, appeals, or other proceedings initiated pursuant to any municipal ordinance providing for the revocation or reduction of the pension of any municipal employee for circumstances constituting dishonorable service as defined by municipal ordinances.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 497, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 526, § 1.